Connecticut, session 2026, HB05319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after January 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Research and development expenses" means research or
experimental expenditures deductible under Section 174 of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on May 28, 1993, determined without
regard to Section 280C(c) of said code or to any elections made by a
taxpayer to amortize such expenditures that were otherwise deductible
on its federal income tax return; and basic research payments, as defined
in Section 41 of said code; that (A) are paid or incurred for such research
and experimentation and basic research conducted in the state, and (B)
are not funded by a grant, contract or governmental entity or a person
other than the taxpayer;
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development;
LCO 1994 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5319
(3) "Qualified small business" means a partnership or an S
corporation, as both terms are defined in section 12-699 of the general
statutes, that (A) has gross income for the previous taxable year that
does not exceed seventy million dollars, and (B) has not, in the
determination of the commissioner, exceeded such gross income
threshold through transactions with a related person, as defined in
section 12-217w of the general statutes; and
(4) "Biotechnology business" means a qualified small business
engaged in the business of applying technologies, such as recombinant
DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular biology, genetics
and genetic engineering, biological cell fusion techniques, and new
bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to produce
or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small molecule
pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems into
useful processes and products.
(b) (1) The Department of Economic and Community Development
shall administer a system of tax credit vouchers, within available
appropriations, to allow qualified small businesses to earn and utilize
credits for research and development expenses.
(2) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, there
shall be allowed a credit for qualified small businesses against the tax
imposed under chapter 229 of the general statutes, other than the
liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes. Such credit
shall be equal to six per cent of the research and development expenses
paid or incurred by a qualified small business for a taxable year and
shall only be allowed to the extent a qualified small business has applied
for and received a tax credit voucher pursuant to this section.
(c) (1) Any qualified small business may apply to the commissioner,
in a form and manner and at a time prescribed by the commissioner, to
reserve an allocation for a credit based on the amount of research and
development expenses such business intends to pay or incur for a
LCO 1994 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5319
taxable year. The application shall contain such information as the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) If the commissioner determines that such business is likely to pay
or incur research and development expenses for a taxable year, the
commissioner may issue a notice to such business, reserving a credit
under this section based on the amount the business intends to pay or
incur. In determining whether to issue such a notice, the commissioner
shall prioritize qualified small businesses that, in the commissioner's
opinion, exhibit a likelihood for growth in the state or will best
contribute to the economic ecosystem of the state.
(3) No qualified small business may reserve more than one million
five hundred thousand dollars of credits under this section for any
taxable year. The aggregate amount of credits that may be reserved
under this section shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars for any
taxable year.
(d) (1) Not later than ninety days after the end of a taxable year, any
qualified small business that received a notice under subsection (c) of
this section shall submit verification, in a form and manner prescribed
by the commissioner, of the research and development expenses
actually paid or incurred by such business for such taxable year. If the
commissioner determines, after reviewing such verification, that the
qualified small business paid or incurred such expenses for the taxable
year, the commissioner shall issue a tax credit voucher to such business
in an amount equal to six per cent of such expenses, provided such
amount shall not exceed the amount reserved for such business under
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The commissioner shall notify the Commissioner of Revenue
Services and the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management of
each tax credit voucher issued under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(e) If the qualified small business is an S corporation or an entity
treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, the credit may
LCO 1994 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5319
be claimed by the shareholders or partners of such business. If the
qualified small business is a single member liability company that is
disregarded as an entity separate from its owner, the credit may be
claimed by such business's owner, provided such owner is subject to the
tax imposed under chapter 229 of the general statutes.
(f) To the extent the credit exceeds a taxpayer's liability under chapter
229 of the general statutes, the taxpayer may apply to the Commissioner
of Revenue Services to exchange the credit, at the same time the
taxpayer files the return upon which such credit is claimed, for a credit
refund equal to ninety per cent of the excess if the credit was earned by
a biotechnology business and sixty-five per cent of the excess if the
credit was earned by a qualified small business other than a
biotechnology business.
(g) The credit allowed under this section shall be claimed before any
other credit allowable against the tax imposed under chapter 229 of the
general statutes.
(h) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to carry out the
provisions of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage and New section
applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after
January 1, 2026
CE Joint Favorable C/R FIN
LCO 1994 4 of 4